Florida, session 2026, HB463.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (d) is added to subsection (3) of
section 319.23, Florida Statutes, to read:
319.23 Application for, and issuance of, certificate of
title.—
(3) If a certificate of title has not previously been
issued for a motor vehicle or mobile home in this state, the
application, unless otherwise provided for in this chapter,
shall be accompanied by a proper bill of sale or sworn statement
of ownership, or a duly certified copy thereof, or by a
certificate of title, bill of sale, or other evidence of
ownership required by the law of the state or county from which
the motor vehicle or mobile home was brought into this state.
The application shall also be accompanied by:
(d)1. The applicant's proof of identity satisfactory to
the department. Such proof must include one of the following
documents issued to the applicant:
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb463-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 463 2026
a. A driver license record or identification card record
from another jurisdiction that required the applicant to submit
a document for identification which is substantially similar to
a document required under sub-subparagraph b., sub-subparagraph
c., sub-subparagraph d., sub-subparagraph e., sub-subparagraph
f., sub-subparagraph g., or sub-subparagraph h.
b. A certified copy of a United States birth certificate;
c. A valid, unexpired United States passport;
d. A naturalization certificate issued by the United
States Department of Homeland Security;
e. A valid, unexpired alien registration receipt card
(green card);
f. A Consular Report of Birth Abroad provided by the
United States Department of State;
g. An unexpired employment authorization card issued by
the United States Department of Homeland Security; or
h. Proof of nonimmigrant classification provided by the
United States Department of Homeland Security. In order to prove
nonimmigrant classification, an applicant must provide at least
one of the following documents. In addition, the department may
require applicants to produce United States Department of
Homeland Security documents for the sole purpose of establishing
the maintenance of, or efforts to maintain, continuous lawful
presence:
(I) A notice of hearing from an immigration court
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb463-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 463 2026
scheduling a hearing on any proceeding.
(II) A notice from the Board of Immigration Appeals
acknowledging pendency of an appeal.
(III) A notice of the approval of an application for
adjustment of status issued by the United States Citizenship and
Immigration Services.
(IV) An official documentation confirming the filing of a
petition for asylum or refugee status or any other relief issued
by the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services.
(V) A notice of action transferring any pending matter
from another jurisdiction to this state issued by the United
States Citizenship and Immigration Services.
(VI) An order of an immigration judge or immigration
officer granting relief that authorizes the alien to live and
work in the United States, including, but not limited to,
asylum.
(VII) Evidence that an application is pending for
adjustment of status to that of an alien lawfully admitted for
permanent residence in the United States or conditional
permanent resident status in the United States, if a visa number
is available having a current priority date for processing by
the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services.
(VIII) An unexpired foreign passport with an unexpired
United States Visa affixed, accompanied by an approved I-94,
documenting the most recent admittance into the United States.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb463-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 463 2026

A driver license or temporary permit issued based on documents
required in sub-subparagraph g. or sub-subparagraph h. is valid
for a period not to exceed the expiration date of the document
presented or 1 year.
2. Each such application may include fingerprints and
other unique biometric means of identity.

Verification of the vehicle identification number is not
required for any new motor vehicle; any mobile home; any trailer
or semitrailer with a net weight of less than 2,000 pounds; or
any travel trailer, camping trailer, truck camper, or fifth-
wheel recreation trailer.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb463-00